Hawaii statutes.
§467B-5.5 Commercial co-venturer's
charitable sales promotions. (a) All charitable sales promotions by a
commercial co-venturer shall disclose the name of the commercial co-venturer.

(b) Prior to the commencement of any
charitable sales promotion in this State conducted by a commercial co-venturer
using the name of a charitable organization, the commercial co‑venturer
shall obtain the written consent of the charitable organization whose name will
be used during the charitable sales promotion. The commercial co-venturer
shall file a copy of the written consent with the department not less than ten
days prior to the commencement of the charitable sales promotion within this
State. An authorized representative of the charitable organization and the commercial
co-venturer shall sign the written consent, and the terms of the written
consent shall include the following:

(1) The goods or services to be offered to the
public;

(2) The geographic area where, and the starting and
final date when, the offering is to be made;

(3) The manner in which the name of the charitable
organization is to be used, including any representation to be made to the
public as to the amount or per cent per unit of goods or services purchased or
used that is to benefit the charitable organization;

(4) A provision for a final accounting on a per unit
basis to be given by the commercial co-venturer to the charitable organization
and the date when it is to be made, which date shall be no more than ninety
days after the end of the charitable sales promotion; and

(5) The date when and the manner in which the benefit
is to be conferred on the charitable organization.

(c) A final accounting for each charitable
sales promotion shall be prepared by the commercial co-venturer following the
completion of the promotion. A copy of the final accounting shall be provided
to the attorney general not more than twenty days after the copy is requested
by the attorney general. The final accounting shall be kept by the commercial
co-venturer for a period of three years, unless the commercial co-venturer and
the charitable organization mutually agree that the accounting should be kept
by the charitable organization instead of the commercial co-venturer.

(d) A late filing fee of $20 shall be imposed
on a commercial co-venturer who fails to file a written consent as required by
subsection (b), unless it is shown that the failure is due to reasonable cause,
for each day during which the violation continues; provided that the total
amount imposed under this subsection shall not exceed $1,000.

(e) The written consent required under
subsection (b) shall be signed by the authorized representative of the
commercial co-venturer and the charitable organization certifying that the
statements made therein are true and correct to the best of their knowledge
subject to penalties imposed by section 710-1063. The attorney general may
require the written consent to be submitted electronically and may require the
use of electronic signatures.

(f) The attorney general may issue a cease and
desist order whenever the attorney general finds that a commercial co-venturer
has engaged in an act or practice that violates this chapter.

(g) When the attorney general finds that a
commercial co-venturer has violated or is operating in violation of this
chapter, the attorney general may impose an administrative fine not to exceed
$1,000 for each act that constitutes a violation of this chapter and an
additional penalty, not to exceed $100 per day, for each day during which the
violation continues. Any person aggrieved by an action of the attorney general
under this section may request a hearing to review that action in accordance
with chapter 91 and rules adopted by the attorney general. Any request for
hearing shall be made within ten days after the attorney general has served the
person with notice of the action, which notice shall be deemed effective upon
mailing. [L 1993, c 206, pt of §1; am L 2004, c 93, §6; am L 2008, c 174, §5;
am L 2013, c 61, §5; am L 2016, c 163, §5]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next